Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1088.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Arizona department of homeland security; cybersecurity programs The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona department of homeland security for cybersecurity programs. Of the appropriation made in this section, $500,000 shall be used for generative artificial intelligence cybersecurity programs and $2,000,000 shall be used to modernize the statewide VPN security network with a zero trust network access solution.